Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-319.08
Securities; not subject to execution.

No creditor or other claimant may levy upon such a deposit or any part thereof. Upon an order of liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation of any depositing insurer or assessment association by a court of competent jurisdiction, the funds deposited and the income therefrom shall be deemed transferred to the director as liquidator, rehabilitator, or conservator.

Laws 1955, c. 174, § 8, p. 500.